District of Columbia statutes.
19-317

Trust estates.

When a trustee is seized of the naked legal estate in real estate in fee simple, and dies intestate thereof, the legal estate descends according to section 19-301 to the persons who would inherit the beneficial estate if it were vested in them.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 699, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
This section is referenced in § 22-3571.02.
1981 Ed., § 19-317.
1973 Ed., § 19-317.